Maryland, session 2026, HB1461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–847.2.
(a) In this section, “specialty drug” has the meaning stated in § 15–847 of this
subtitle.
(b) (1) This section applies to:
(i) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide coverage
for prescription drugs under individual, group, or blanket health insurance policies or
contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and
(ii) health maintenance organizations that provide coverage for
prescription drugs under individual or group contracts that are issued or delivered in the
State.
(2) An insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance
organization that provides coverage for prescription drugs through a pharmacy benefits
manager is subject to the requirements of this section.

HOUSE BILL 1461 3
(c) An entity subject to this section may not exclude coverage for a covered
specialty drug administered or dispensed by a provider under § 12–102 of the Health
Occupations Article if the entity determines that:
(1) (I) the provider that administers or dispenses the covered specialty
drug:
[(i)] 1. is an in–network provider of covered oncology services;
and
[(ii)] 2. complies with State regulations for the administering and
dispensing of specialty drugs; and
[(2)] (II) the covered specialty drug is:
[(i)] 1. auto–injected or an oral targeted immune modulator; or
[(ii)] 2. an oral medication that:
[1.] A. requires complex dosing based on clinical
presentation; or
[2.] B. is used concomitantly with other infusion or
radiation therapies; OR
(2) (I) FOR A SPECIALTY DRUG FOR THE TREATMENT OF
RHEUMATOLOGIC CONDITIONS, THE PROVIDER THAT ADMINISTERS OR DISPENSES
THE COVERED SPECIALTY DRUG:
1. IS AN IN–NETWORK PROVIDER OF COVERED
RHEUMATOLOGY SERVICES; AND
2. COMPLIES WITH THE STATE REGULATIONS FOR THE
ADMINISTERING AND DISPENSING OF SPECIALTY DRUGS; AND
(II) THE COVERED SPECIALTY DRUG IS:
1. AUTO–INJECTED OR AN ORAL TARGETED IMMUNE
MODULATOR; OR
2. AN ORAL MEDICATION THAT:
A. REQUIRES COMPLEX DOSING BASED ON CLINICAL
PRESENTATION; OR

HOUSE BILL 1461
B. IS USED CONCOMITANTLY WITH OTHER INFUSION
THERAPIES.
(d) (1) Subject to subsection (f) of this section, the reimbursement rate for
specialty drugs covered under this section shall be:
(i) agreed to by the covered, in–network provider and the entity
subject to this section; and
(ii) billed at a nonhospital level of care or place of service.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed to by the covered, in–network provider and the
entity subject to this section, the reimbursement rate for specialty drugs covered under this
section may not exceed the rate applicable to a designated specialty pharmacy for
dispensing the covered specialty drugs.
(e) This section does not prohibit an entity subject to this section from refusing to
authorize or approve or from denying coverage for a covered specialty drug administered or
dispensed by a provider if administering or dispensing the drug fails to satisfy medical
necessity criteria.
(f) This section may not be construed to supersede the authority of the Health
Services Cost Review Commission to set rates for specialty drugs administered to patients
in a setting regulated by the Health Services Cost Review Commission.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.